apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="دەتوان__vbmod">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەتوان__vbmod">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەک__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="دەک__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەک__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەک__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="دەگەڕ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="نەدەگەڕ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەڵ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="دەگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەڵ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="دەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەک_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="دەک_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەک_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەک_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- prs: Transitivity, Polarity -->

    <pardef n="بگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="بگەڕ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بگەڕ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بک_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="بک_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەک_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بک_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بک__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="بک__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەک__vblex_tv">
     <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەک__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بک__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بگەڕ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="بگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بڵ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="بگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەگەڕ__vblex_iv">
     <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەگەڕ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بگەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بخ_ۆ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv">
     <e><p><l>ۆ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بر_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەر_ۆ__vblex_iv">
     <e><p><l>ۆ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ۆەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆنەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بر_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەر_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ۆەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆنەوە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
     <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەر_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بچ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="بچ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مەچ__vblex_iv">
     <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="وتن"><p><l>دەڵ</l><r>وتن</r></p><par n="دەڵ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="وتن"><p><l>نەدەڵ</l><r>وتن</r></p><par n="نەدەڵ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="وتن"><p><l>بڵ</l><r>وتن</r></p><par n="بڵ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="چوون"><p><l>بچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="بچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەیشتن"><p><l>مەگ</l><r>گەیشتن</r></p><par n="مەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەیشتن"><p><l>بگ</l><r>گەیشتن</r></p><par n="بک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕانەوە"><p><l>نەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕانەوە</r></p><par n="نەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕانەوە"><p><l>نەدەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕانەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕانەوە"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناگەڕ</l><r>گەڕانەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕانەوە"><p><l>دەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕانەوە</r></p><par n="دەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕانەوە"><p><l>بگەڕ</l><r>گەڕانەوە</r></p><par n="بگەڕ_ەوە__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"><p><l>نەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="نەگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"><p><l>نەدەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="نەدەگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="نەدەگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"><p><l>ناگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="نەدەگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"><p><l>دەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="دەگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"><p><l>مەگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="مەگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="گەڕان"><p><l>بگەڕ</l><r>گەڕان</r></p><par n="بگەڕ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردنەوە"><p><l>نەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردنەوە"><p><l>نەدەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردنەوە"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردنەوە"><p><l>دەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="دەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردنەوە"><p><l>بک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="بک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردن"><p><l>نەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="نەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردن"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="نەدەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردن"><p><l>دەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="دەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردن"><p><l>مەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="مەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="شتن"><p><l>مەش</l><r>شتن</r></p><par n="مەش_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="دان"><p><l>بد</l><r>دان</r></p><par n="بک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردن"><p><l>دەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="دەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کردن" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="خوارد__vblex_non_lvc"/><par n="نەدەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>نەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>مەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="مەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>بخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>نەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>مەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="مەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>بخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خستن"><p><l>نەخ</l><r>خستن</r></p><par n="نەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خستن"><p><l>دەخ</l><r>خستن</r></p><par n="دەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خستن"><p><l>مەخ</l><r>خستن</r></p><par n="مەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خستن"><p><l>بخ</l><r>خستن</r></p><par n="بک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="توانین"><p><l>نەدەتوان</l><r>توانین</r></p><par n="نەدەتوان__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="توانین"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناتوان</l><r>توانین</r></p><par n="نەدەتوان__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="توانین"><p><l>دەتوان</l><r>توانین</r></p><par n="دەتوان__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="بردن"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناب</l><r>بردن</r></p><par n="نەدەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن"><p><l>نەر</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="نەر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن"><p><l>مەر</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="مەر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن"><p><l>بر</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="بر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
